Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.610

Port district noise mitigation—Grant program.

(1) The department of commerce shall administer a grant program to provide assistance to qualifying port districts for expenses related to noise mitigation pursuant to RCW 53.54.030(2) (c) and (d).

(2) The department of commerce shall prepare and publish an annual report on its website detailing grants made under this section. The report must include: (a) The number of inspectors or other professionals contracted; (b) the number of inspections conducted; (c) the number of properties provided with new or improved noise mitigation equipment subsequent to an inspection; (d) the number of properties receiving funds to address hazards or damages proven by an inspection to be associated with the installation of noise mitigation equipment; and (e) the number of inspected properties where no repairs occurred and the reasons why.

(3) A qualifying port district receiving funds under this section may commit to matching, from port district funds not subject to federal airport revenue use requirements, at least half of the total funding provided by the legislature under RCW 53.20.090 for the purposes of noise mitigation under RCW 53.54.030(2) (c) and (d) each fiscal year.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualifying port district" means a port district authorized to undertake programs for the abatement of aircraft noise under RCW 53.54.010.

[ 2024 c 194 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note—Sunset Act application: The port district noise mitigation grant program is subject to review, termination, and possible extension under chapter 43.131 RCW, the Sunset Act. See RCW 43.131.429. RCW 43.330.610 is scheduled for future repeal under RCW 43.131.430.

Legislative findings—Intent—2024 c 194: See note following RCW 53.54.030.